Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1797.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Unit Pricing Modernization Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Consumer commodity." Any food, beverage, household supply, toiletry or other article of personal or domestic use that is customarily consumed or used by individuals and offered for retail sale in packaged form, including goods sold through e-commerce platforms."Department." The Department of Agriculture of the 123456789101112131415161718 Commonwealth."E-commerce." The sale of consumer commodities through an online platform, including a website, mobile application or other Internet-based interface, where consumers may view, select and purchase products."Electronic shelf label." A digital or electronic display device used by retailers to show product pricing and information."NIST." The National Institute of Standards and Technology."Small retailer." A retail establishment that operates no more than three physical locations within this Commonwealth and has annual gross sales of less than $1,000,000, as determined by the department through regulation."Unit price." The price per standard unit of measure at which a product is offered for sale.Section 3. Applicability and requirements.(a) Price display.--Retailers operating in this Commonwealth shall display unit prices for consumer commodities offered for sale in the retailer's establishments.(b) Unit prices.--Unit prices must be:(1) Clearly and conspicuously displayed adjacent to the item or on the item's shelf tag.(2) Provided per common unit of measurement.(3) Consistent in format with NIST Special Publication 1181 (relating to Unit Pricing Guide: A Best Practice Approach to Unit Pricing) standards in effect on the effective date of this paragraph, including formatting for digital or electronic displays.(c) Digital availability.--Retailers utilizing e-commerce platforms or electronic shelf labels shall ensure that unit 20250HB1797PN2210 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prices are made available digitally in a uniform and accessible manner consistent with NIST guidance and in accordance with department regulations.(d) Exclusions.--Exceptions and waivers may be granted by the department for limited product types or in cases of hardship for small retailers, pursuant to regulations promulgated under this act. The following shall apply:(1) The department shall establish by regulation the criteria and procedures for requesting a waiver under this subsection.(2) Waivers shall be granted on a case-by-case basis and shall be time-limited unless renewed upon showing of continued hardship or justified cause.(3) Each waiver decision shall be made publicly available in accordance with department policy.Section 4. Enforcement.(a) Regulations.--The department, in consultation with the Office of Attorney General, Bureau of Consumer Protection, shall adopt regulations to implement and enforce this act.(b) Penalties.--Penalties for violations under this act shall be subject to enforcement actions and fines as determined by the Office of Attorney General, Bureau of Consumer Protection.(c) Deposit.--Penalty fees collected under this act shall be deposited into the General Fund.Section 5. Rulemaking authority.The department may promulgate regulations to align with updates to NIST Handbook 130 and Special Publication 1181 as they become available by transmitting notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of 20250HB1797PN2210 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The notice shall have the effect of law and shall not be subject to review under the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1797PN2210 - 4 - 12345